North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163A. Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act.
=c1 163-278.23 =c2 163A-1441
=c1 163-278.24 =c2 163A-1442
=c1 163-278.25 =c2 163A-1443
=c1 163-278.26 =c2 163A-1444
=c1 163-278.27 =c2 163A-1445 =c1 163-278.28 =c2 163A-1446
=c1 163-278.29 =c2 163A-1447 =c1 163-278.30 =c2 163A-1448
=c1 163-278.31
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.32 =c2 163A-1449
=c1 163-278.33 =c2 163A-1450
=c1 163-278.34 =c2 163A-1451
=c1 163-278.34A =c2 163A-1452
=c1 163-278.35 =c2 163A-1453
=c1 163-278.36 previously repealed
=c1 163-278.37 =c2 163A-1454
=c1 163-278.38 =c2 163A-1455
=c1
Part 1A

=c2

Part 2 =c1 163-278.38Z =c2 163A-1475
=c1 163-278.39 =c2 163A-1476 =c1 163-278.39A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.39B previously recodified
=c1 163-278.39C =c2 163A-1477
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Part 3
=c1 163-278.40 =c2 163A-1495
=c1 163-278.40A =c2 163A-1496
=c1 163-278.40B =c2 163A-1497
=c1 163-278.40C =c2 163A-1498
=c1 163-278.40D =c2 163A-1499
=c1 163-278.40E =c2 163A-1500
=c1 163-278.40F =c2 163A-1501
=c1 163-278.40G =c2 163A-1502
=c1 163-278.40H =c2 163A-1503
=c1 163-278.40I =c2 163A-1504
=c1 163-278.40J =c2 163A-1505
=c1
Articles 22B, 22C
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22D

=c2

Article 24
=c1 163-278.69 =c2 163A-1520
=c1
Articles 22E, 22F
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22J

=c2

Article 25
=c1 163-278.99E =c2 163A-1535
=c1
Articles 22G, 22H
previously repealed
=c1
Articles 22I, K, L reserved
=c1
Article 22M

=c2

Article 26
=c1 163-278.300 =c2 163A-1550
=c1 163-278.301 =c2 163A-1551 =c1 163-278.302 thru
=c2 163A-1552
thru =c1 163-278.305 reserved =c2 163A-1555 reserved
=c1 163-278.306 =c2 163A-1556
=c1 163-278.307 =c2 163A-1557
=c1 163-278.308 =c2 163A-1558 =c1 163-278.309 =c2 163A-1559
=c1 163-278.310 =c2 163A-1560 =c1 163-278.311 thru
=c2 163A-1561 thru =c1 163-278.315 reserved =c2 163A-1565 reserved
=c1 163-278.316 =c2 163A-1566
=c1 163-278.317 thru
=c2 163A-1567 thru =c1 163-278.319 reserved =c2 163A-1569
reserved
=c1 163-278.320 =c2 163A-1570
=c1
Subchapter IX

=c2

Article 27
=c1
Article 23

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-279 =c2 163A-1585 =c1 163-280 thru
163-281 previously repealed
=c1 163-282 =c2 163A-1586
=c1 163-283 =c2 163A-1587
=c1 163-283.1 =c2 163A-1588
=c1 163-284 =c2 163A-1589
=c1 163-284.1 =c2 163A-1590
=c1 163-285 previously repealed
=c1 163-286 =c2 163A-1591
=c1 163-287 =c2 163A-1592
=c1 163-288 =c2 163A-1593
=c1 163-288.1 =c2 163A-1594
=c1 163-288.1A =c2 163A-1595
=c1 163-288.2 =c2 163A-1596
=c1 163-288.3 =c2 163A-1597
=c1 163-289 =c2 163A-1598
=c1 163-290 =c2 163A-1599
=c1
Article 24

=c2

Part 2
=c1

163-291 =c2 163A-1615
=c1 163-292 =c2 163A-1616
=c1 163-293 =c2 163A-1617
=c1 163-294 =c2 163A-1618
=c1 163-294.1 =c2 163A-1619
=c1 163-294.2 =c2 163A-1620
=c1 163-294.3 =c2 163A-1621
=c1 163-294.4 =c2 163A-1622
=c1 163-295 =c2 163A-1623
=c1 163-296 =c2 163A-1624
=c1 163-297 =c2 163A-1625
=c1 163-298 =c2 163A-1626
=c1 163-299 =c2 163A-1627
=c1 163-300 =c2 163A-1628
=c1 163-301 =c2 163A-1629
=c1 163-302 =c2 163A-1630
=c1 163-303
previously repealed
=c1 163-304 =c2 163A-1631
=c1 163-305 =c2 163A-1632
=c1 163-306 =c2 163A-1633
=c1

Subchapter X repealed =c1
Article 25 repealed =te =c1
Part 3

=c2

Subpart 3
=c1 163-166 previously repealed
=c1 163-166.01 =c2 163A-1130
=c1 163-166.1 =c2 163A-1131
=c1 163-166.2 =c2 163A-1132
=c1 163-166.3 =c2 163A-1133
=c1 163-166.4 =c2 163A-1134
=c1 163-166.5 =c2 163A-1135
=c1 163-166.6 =c2 163A-1136
=c1 163-166.7 =c2 163A-1137
=c1 163-166.7A =c2 163A-1138
=c1 163-166.8 =c2 163A-1139
=c1 163-166.9 =c2 163A-1140
=c1 163-166.10 =c2 163A-1141
=c1 163-166.11 =c2 163A-1142
=c1 163-166.11A =c2 163A-1143
=c1 163-166.12 =c2 163A-1144
=c1 163-166.13 =c2 163A-1145
=c1 163-166.14 =c2 163A-1146
=c1 163-166.15 =c2 163A-1147
=c1 163-166.16 =c2 163A-1145.1 =c1 163-166.17 =c2 163A-1145.2 =c1 163-166.18 =c2 163A-1145.3 =c1
Article 15
previously repealed

=c1

Article 15A

=c2

Part 4
=c1 163-182 =c2 163A-1165
=c1 163-182.1 =c2 163A-1166
=c1 163-182.1A =c2 163A-1167
=c1 163-182.1B =c2 163A-1168
=c1 163-182.2 =c2 163A-1169
=c1 163-182.3 =c2 163A-1170
=c1 163-182.4 =c2 163A-1171
=c1 163-182.5 =c2 163A-1172
=c1 163-182.6 =c2 163A-1173
=c1 163-182.7 =c2 163A-1174
=c1 163-182.7A =c2 163A-1175
=c1 163-182.8 =c2 163A-1176
=c1 163-182.9 =c2 163A-1177
=c1 163-182.10 =c2 163A-1178
=c1 163-182.11 =c2 163A-1179
=c1 163-182.12 =c2 163A-1180
=c1 163-182.13 =c2 163A-1181
=c1 163-182.13A =c2 163A-1182
=c1 163-182.14 =c2 163A-1183
=c1 163-182.15 =c2 163A-1184
=c1 163-182.16 =c2 163A-1185
=c1 163-182.17 =c2 163A-1186
=c1
Article 16
previously repealed
=c1
Article 17

=c2

Part 5
=c1 163-201 =c2 163A-1205
=c1 163-201.1 =c2 163A-1206
=c1 163-201.2
previously repealed =c1 163-202 =c2 163A-1207
=c1
Article 18

=c2

Part 6
=c1 163-208 =c2 163A-1225
=c1 163-209 =c2 163A-1226
=c1 163-209.1 =c2 163A-1227
=c1 163-209.2 =c2 163A-1228
=c1 163-210 =c2 163A-1229
=c1 163-211 =c2 163A-1230
=c1 163-212 =c2 163A-1231
=c1 163-213 =c2 163A-1232
=c1
Article 18A

=c2

Part 7
=c1 163-213.1 =c2 163A-1250
=c1 163-213.2 =c2 163A-1251
=c1 163-213.3 =c2 163A-1252
=c1 163-213.4 =c2 163A-1253
=c1 163-213.5 =c2 163A-1254
=c1 163-213.6 =c2 163A-1255
=c1 163-213.7 =c2 163A-1256
=c1 163-213.8 =c2 163A-1257
=c1 163-213.9 =c2 163A-1258
=c1 163-213.10 previously transferred
=c1 163-213.11
previously repealed =c1
Article 19

=c2

Part 8
=c1 163-218 =c2 163A-1275
=c1 163-219 =c2 163A-1276
=c1 163-220 =c2 163A-1277
=c1 163-221 =c2 163A-1278
=c1
Subchapter VII

=c2

Article 21
=c1
Article 20

=c2

Part 1 =c1 163-226 =c2 163A-1295
=c1 163-226.1 =c2 163A-1296
=c1 163-226.2 =c2 163A-1297
=c1 163-226.3 =c2 163A-1298
=c1 163-227
previously repealed
=c1 163-227.1 =c2 163A-1299
=c1 163-227.2
(containing former 163-227.2(a), (b), =c1
(c)-(e), (e2),
(f), (h), (i))
=c2 163A-1300 =c1 163-227.3 (recodified by the Codifier =c1
as 163-227.10)) =c2 163A-1305 =c1 163-227.4
(containing former =c1
163-227.2(b1), (j))
=c2 163A-1301 =c1 163-227.5 (containing former =c1
163-227.2(e1))
=c2 163A-1302 =c1 163-227.6 (containing former =c1
163-227.2(g), (g1))
=c2 163A-1303 =c1 163-227.7
(containing former =c1
163-227.2(g2), (g3)) =c2 163A-1304 =c1 163-227.8, 163-227.9 reserved =c1 163-228 =c2 163A-1306
=c1 163-229 =c2 163A-1307
=c1 163-230 previously repealed =c1 163-230.1 =c2 163A-1308
=c1 163-230.2 =c2 163A-1309 =c1 163-231 =c2 163A-1310
=c1 163-232 =c2 163A-1311
=c1 163-232.1 =c2 163A-1312
=c1 163-233 =c2 163A-1313
=c1 163-233.1 =c2 163A-1314
=c1 163-234 =c2 163A-1315
=c1 163-235
previously repealed
=c1 163-236 =c2 163A-1316
=c1 163-237 =c2 163A-1317
=c1 163-238 =c2 163A-1318
=c1 163-239 =c2 163A-1319
=c1 163-240 thru 163-240.5
Expired
=c1
Article 21 previously repealed

=c1

Article 21A

=c2

Part 2
=c1
Part 1

=c2

Subpart 1
=c1 163-258.1 =c2 163A-1335
=c1 163-258.2 =c2 163A-1336
=c1 163-258.3 =c2 163A-1337
=c1 163-258.4 =c2 163A-1338
=c1 163-258.5 =c2 163A-1339
=c1 163-258.6 =c2 163A-1340
=c1 163-258.7 =c2 163A-1341
=c1 163-258.8 =c2 163A-1342
=c1 163-258.9 =c2 163A-1343
=c1 163-258.10 =c2 163A-1344
=c1 163-258.11 =c2 163A-1345
=c1 163-258.12 =c2 163A-1346
=c1 163-258.13 =c2 163A-1347
=c1 163-258.14 =c2 163A-1348
=c1 163-258.15 =c2 163A-1349
=c1 163-258.16 =c2 163A-1350
=c1 163-258.17 =c2 163A-1351
=c1 163-258.18 =c2 163A-1352
=c1 163-258.19 =c2 163A-1353
=c1 163-258.20 =c2 163A-1354
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Subpart 2
=c1 163-258.26 =c2 163A-1365
=c1 163-258.27 =c2 163A-1366
=c1 163-258.28 =c2 163A-1367 =c1 163-258.29 =c2 163A-1368
=c1 163-258.30 =c2 163A-1369 =c1 163-258.31 =c2 163A-1370
=c1
Subchapter VIII

=c1

Article 22

=c2

Article 22
=c1 163-271 =c2 163A-1385
=c1 163-272
previously repealed
=c1 163-272.1 =c2 163A-1386
=c1 163-273 =c2 163A-1387
=c1 163-274 =c2 163A-1388
=c1 163-275 =c2 163A-1389
=c1 163-276 =c2 163A-1390
=c1 163-277 =c2 163A-1391
=c1 163-278 =c2 163A-1392
=c1
Article 22A

=c2

Article 23
=c1
Part 1

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-278.5 =c2 163A-1410
=c1 163-278.6 =c2 163A-1411
=c1 163-278.7 =c2 163A-1412
=c1 163-278.7A =c2 163A-1413
=c1 163-278.8 =c2 163A-1414
=c1 163-278.8A =c2 163A-1415
=c1 163-278.8B =c2 163A-1416
=c1 163-278.8C =c2 163A-1417
=c1 163-278.9 =c2 163A-1418
=c1 163-278.9A =c2 163A-1419
=c1 163-278.10 =c2 163A-1420
=c1 163-278.10A =c2 163A-1421
=c1 163-278.11 =c2 163A-1422
=c1 163-278.12 =c2 163A-1423
=c1 163-278.12A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.12B reserved
=c1 163-278.12C =c2 163A-1424
=c1 163-278.13 =c2 163A-1425
=c1 163-278.13A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.13B =c2 163A-1426
=c1 163-278.13C =c2 163A-1427 =c1 163-278.14 =c2 163A-1428
=c1 163-278.14A =c2 163A-1429 =c1 163-278.15 =c2 163A-1430
=c1 163-278.16 =c2 163A-1431 =c1 163-278.16A =c2 163A-1432
=c1 163-278.16B =c2 163A-1433 =c1 163-278.17 =c2 163A-1434
=c1 163-278.18 =c2 163A-1435 =c1 163-278.19 =c2 163A-1436
=c1 163-278.19A =c2 163A-1437 =c1 163-278.19B =c2 163A-1438
=c1 163-278.20
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.21 =c2 163A-1439
=c1 163-278.22 =c2 163A-1440
=c1 163-278.23 =c2 163A-1441
=c1 163-278.24 =c2 163A-1442
=c1 163-278.25 =c2 163A-1443
=c1 163-278.26 =c2 163A-1444
=c1 163-278.27 =c2 163A-1445 =c1 163-278.28 =c2 163A-1446
=c1 163-278.29 =c2 163A-1447 =c1 163-278.30 =c2 163A-1448
=c1 163-278.31
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.32 =c2 163A-1449
=c1 163-278.33 =c2 163A-1450
=c1 163-278.34 =c2 163A-1451
=c1 163-278.34A =c2 163A-1452
=c1 163-278.35 =c2 163A-1453
=c1 163-278.36 previously repealed
=c1 163-278.37 =c2 163A-1454
=c1 163-278.38 =c2 163A-1455
=c1
Part 1A

=c2

Part 2 =c1 163-278.38Z =c2 163A-1475
=c1 163-278.39 =c2 163A-1476 =c1 163-278.39A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.39B previously recodified
=c1 163-278.39C =c2 163A-1477
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Part 3
=c1 163-278.40 =c2 163A-1495
=c1 163-278.40A =c2 163A-1496
=c1 163-278.40B =c2 163A-1497
=c1 163-278.40C =c2 163A-1498
=c1 163-278.40D =c2 163A-1499
=c1 163-278.40E =c2 163A-1500
=c1 163-278.40F =c2 163A-1501
=c1 163-278.40G =c2 163A-1502
=c1 163-278.40H =c2 163A-1503
=c1 163-278.40I =c2 163A-1504
=c1 163-278.40J =c2 163A-1505
=c1
Articles 22B, 22C
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22D

=c2

Article 24
=c1 163-278.69 =c2 163A-1520
=c1
Articles 22E, 22F
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22J

=c2

Article 25
=c1 163-278.99E =c2 163A-1535
=c1
Articles 22G, 22H
previously repealed
=c1
Articles 22I, K, L reserved
=c1
Article 22M

=c2

Article 26
=c1 163-278.300 =c2 163A-1550
=c1 163-278.301 =c2 163A-1551 =c1 163-278.302 thru
=c2 163A-1552
thru =c1 163-278.305 reserved =c2 163A-1555 reserved
=c1 163-278.306 =c2 163A-1556
=c1 163-278.307 =c2 163A-1557
=c1 163-278.308 =c2 163A-1558 =c1 163-278.309 =c2 163A-1559
=c1 163-278.310 =c2 163A-1560 =c1 163-278.311 thru
=c2 163A-1561 thru =c1 163-278.315 reserved =c2 163A-1565 reserved
=c1 163-278.316 =c2 163A-1566
=c1 163-278.317 thru
=c2 163A-1567 thru =c1 163-278.319 reserved =c2 163A-1569
reserved
=c1 163-278.320 =c2 163A-1570
=c1
Subchapter IX

=c2

Article 27
=c1
Article 23

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-279 =c2 163A-1585 =c1 163-280 thru
163-281 previously repealed
=c1 163-282 =c2 163A-1586
=c1 163-283 =c2 163A-1587
=c1 163-283.1 =c2 163A-1588
=c1 163-284 =c2 163A-1589
=c1 163-284.1 =c2 163A-1590
=c1 163-285 previously repealed
=c1 163-286 =c2 163A-1591
=c1 163-287 =c2 163A-1592
=c1 163-288 =c2 163A-1593
=c1 163-288.1 =c2 163A-1594
=c1 163-288.1A =c2 163A-1595
=c1 163-288.2 =c2 163A-1596
=c1 163-288.3 =c2 163A-1597
=c1 163-289 =c2 163A-1598
=c1 163-290 =c2 163A-1599
=c1
Article 24

=c2

Part 2
=c1

163-291 =c2 163A-1615
=c1 163-292 =c2 163A-1616
=c1 163-293 =c2 163A-1617
=c1 163-294 =c2 163A-1618
=c1 163-294.1 =c2 163A-1619
=c1 163-294.2 =c2 163A-1620
=c1 163-294.3 =c2 163A-1621
=c1 163-294.4 =c2 163A-1622
=c1 163-295 =c2 163A-1623
=c1 163-296 =c2 163A-1624
=c1 163-297 =c2 163A-1625
=c1 163-298 =c2 163A-1626
=c1 163-299 =c2 163A-1627
=c1 163-300 =c2 163A-1628
=c1 163-301 =c2 163A-1629
=c1 163-302 =c2 163A-1630
=c1 163-303
previously repealed
=c1 163-304 =c2 163A-1631
=c1 163-305 =c2 163A-1632
=c1 163-306 =c2 163A-1633
=c1

Subchapter X repealed =c1
Article 25 repealed =te =c1

163-230.1 =c2 163A-1308
=c1 163-230.2 =c2 163A-1309 =c1 163-231 =c2 163A-1310
=c1 163-232 =c2 163A-1311
=c1 163-232.1 =c2 163A-1312
=c1 163-233 =c2 163A-1313
=c1 163-233.1 =c2 163A-1314
=c1 163-234 =c2 163A-1315
=c1 163-235
previously repealed
=c1 163-236 =c2 163A-1316
=c1 163-237 =c2 163A-1317
=c1 163-238 =c2 163A-1318
=c1 163-239 =c2 163A-1319
=c1 163-240 thru 163-240.5
Expired
=c1

Article 21 previously repealed

=c1

Article 21A

=c2

Part 2
=c1
Part 1

=c2

Subpart 1
=c1 163-258.1 =c2 163A-1335
=c1 163-258.2 =c2 163A-1336
=c1 163-258.3 =c2 163A-1337
=c1 163-258.4 =c2 163A-1338
=c1 163-258.5 =c2 163A-1339
=c1 163-258.6 =c2 163A-1340
=c1 163-258.7 =c2 163A-1341
=c1 163-258.8 =c2 163A-1342
=c1 163-258.9 =c2 163A-1343
=c1 163-258.10 =c2 163A-1344
=c1 163-258.11 =c2 163A-1345
=c1 163-258.12 =c2 163A-1346
=c1 163-258.13 =c2 163A-1347
=c1 163-258.14 =c2 163A-1348
=c1 163-258.15 =c2 163A-1349
=c1 163-258.16 =c2 163A-1350
=c1 163-258.17 =c2 163A-1351
=c1 163-258.18 =c2 163A-1352
=c1 163-258.19 =c2 163A-1353
=c1 163-258.20 =c2 163A-1354
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Subpart 2
=c1 163-258.26 =c2 163A-1365
=c1 163-258.27 =c2 163A-1366
=c1 163-258.28 =c2 163A-1367 =c1 163-258.29 =c2 163A-1368
=c1 163-258.30 =c2 163A-1369 =c1 163-258.31 =c2 163A-1370
=c1
Subchapter VIII

=c1

Article 22

=c2

Article 22
=c1 163-271 =c2 163A-1385
=c1 163-272
previously repealed
=c1 163-272.1 =c2 163A-1386
=c1 163-273 =c2 163A-1387
=c1 163-274 =c2 163A-1388
=c1 163-275 =c2 163A-1389
=c1 163-276 =c2 163A-1390
=c1 163-277 =c2 163A-1391
=c1 163-278 =c2 163A-1392
=c1
Article 22A

=c2

Article 23
=c1
Part 1

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-278.5 =c2 163A-1410
=c1 163-278.6 =c2 163A-1411
=c1 163-278.7 =c2 163A-1412
=c1 163-278.7A =c2 163A-1413
=c1 163-278.8 =c2 163A-1414
=c1 163-278.8A =c2 163A-1415
=c1 163-278.8B =c2 163A-1416
=c1 163-278.8C =c2 163A-1417
=c1 163-278.9 =c2 163A-1418
=c1 163-278.9A =c2 163A-1419
=c1 163-278.10 =c2 163A-1420
=c1 163-278.10A =c2 163A-1421
=c1 163-278.11 =c2 163A-1422
=c1 163-278.12 =c2 163A-1423
=c1 163-278.12A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.12B reserved
=c1 163-278.12C =c2 163A-1424
=c1 163-278.13 =c2 163A-1425
=c1 163-278.13A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.13B =c2 163A-1426
=c1 163-278.13C =c2 163A-1427 =c1 163-278.14 =c2 163A-1428
=c1 163-278.14A =c2 163A-1429 =c1 163-278.15 =c2 163A-1430
=c1 163-278.16 =c2 163A-1431 =c1 163-278.16A =c2 163A-1432
=c1 163-278.16B =c2 163A-1433 =c1 163-278.17 =c2 163A-1434
=c1 163-278.18 =c2 163A-1435 =c1 163-278.19 =c2 163A-1436
=c1 163-278.19A =c2 163A-1437 =c1 163-278.19B =c2 163A-1438
=c1 163-278.20
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.21 =c2 163A-1439
=c1 163-278.22 =c2 163A-1440
=c1 163-278.23 =c2 163A-1441
=c1 163-278.24 =c2 163A-1442
=c1 163-278.25 =c2 163A-1443
=c1 163-278.26 =c2 163A-1444
=c1 163-278.27 =c2 163A-1445 =c1 163-278.28 =c2 163A-1446
=c1 163-278.29 =c2 163A-1447 =c1 163-278.30 =c2 163A-1448
=c1 163-278.31
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.32 =c2 163A-1449
=c1 163-278.33 =c2 163A-1450
=c1 163-278.34 =c2 163A-1451
=c1 163-278.34A =c2 163A-1452
=c1 163-278.35 =c2 163A-1453
=c1 163-278.36 previously repealed
=c1 163-278.37 =c2 163A-1454
=c1 163-278.38 =c2 163A-1455
=c1
Part 1A

=c2

Part 2 =c1 163-278.38Z =c2 163A-1475
=c1 163-278.39 =c2 163A-1476 =c1 163-278.39A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.39B previously recodified
=c1 163-278.39C =c2 163A-1477
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Part 3
=c1 163-278.40 =c2 163A-1495
=c1 163-278.40A =c2 163A-1496
=c1 163-278.40B =c2 163A-1497
=c1 163-278.40C =c2 163A-1498
=c1 163-278.40D =c2 163A-1499
=c1 163-278.40E =c2 163A-1500
=c1 163-278.40F =c2 163A-1501
=c1 163-278.40G =c2 163A-1502
=c1 163-278.40H =c2 163A-1503
=c1 163-278.40I =c2 163A-1504
=c1 163-278.40J =c2 163A-1505
=c1
Articles 22B, 22C
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22D

=c2

Article 24
=c1 163-278.69 =c2 163A-1520
=c1
Articles 22E, 22F
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22J

=c2

Article 25
=c1 163-278.99E =c2 163A-1535
=c1
Articles 22G, 22H
previously repealed
=c1
Articles 22I, K, L reserved
=c1
Article 22M

=c2

Article 26
=c1 163-278.300 =c2 163A-1550
=c1 163-278.301 =c2 163A-1551 =c1 163-278.302 thru
=c2 163A-1552
thru =c1 163-278.305 reserved =c2 163A-1555 reserved
=c1 163-278.306 =c2 163A-1556
=c1 163-278.307 =c2 163A-1557
=c1 163-278.308 =c2 163A-1558 =c1 163-278.309 =c2 163A-1559
=c1 163-278.310 =c2 163A-1560 =c1 163-278.311 thru
=c2 163A-1561 thru =c1 163-278.315 reserved =c2 163A-1565 reserved
=c1 163-278.316 =c2 163A-1566
=c1 163-278.317 thru
=c2 163A-1567 thru =c1 163-278.319 reserved =c2 163A-1569
reserved
=c1 163-278.320 =c2 163A-1570
=c1
Subchapter IX

=c2

Article 27
=c1
Article 23

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-279 =c2 163A-1585 =c1 163-280 thru
163-281 previously repealed
=c1 163-282 =c2 163A-1586
=c1 163-283 =c2 163A-1587
=c1 163-283.1 =c2 163A-1588
=c1 163-284 =c2 163A-1589
=c1 163-284.1 =c2 163A-1590
=c1 163-285 previously repealed
=c1 163-286 =c2 163A-1591
=c1 163-287 =c2 163A-1592
=c1 163-288 =c2 163A-1593
=c1 163-288.1 =c2 163A-1594
=c1 163-288.1A =c2 163A-1595
=c1 163-288.2 =c2 163A-1596
=c1 163-288.3 =c2 163A-1597
=c1 163-289 =c2 163A-1598
=c1 163-290 =c2 163A-1599
=c1
Article 24

=c2

Part 2
=c1

163-291 =c2 163A-1615
=c1 163-292 =c2 163A-1616
=c1 163-293 =c2 163A-1617
=c1 163-294 =c2 163A-1618
=c1 163-294.1 =c2 163A-1619
=c1 163-294.2 =c2 163A-1620
=c1 163-294.3 =c2 163A-1621
=c1 163-294.4 =c2 163A-1622
=c1 163-295 =c2 163A-1623
=c1 163-296 =c2 163A-1624
=c1 163-297 =c2 163A-1625
=c1 163-298 =c2 163A-1626
=c1 163-299 =c2 163A-1627
=c1 163-300 =c2 163A-1628
=c1 163-301 =c2 163A-1629
=c1 163-302 =c2 163A-1630
=c1 163-303
previously repealed
=c1 163-304 =c2 163A-1631
=c1 163-305 =c2 163A-1632
=c1 163-306 =c2 163A-1633
=c1

Subchapter X repealed =c1
Article 25 repealed =te =c1

163-278.28 =c2 163A-1446
=c1 163-278.29 =c2 163A-1447 =c1 163-278.30 =c2 163A-1448
=c1 163-278.31
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.32 =c2 163A-1449
=c1 163-278.33 =c2 163A-1450
=c1 163-278.34 =c2 163A-1451
=c1 163-278.34A =c2 163A-1452
=c1 163-278.35 =c2 163A-1453
=c1 163-278.36 previously repealed
=c1 163-278.37 =c2 163A-1454
=c1 163-278.38 =c2 163A-1455
=c1

Part 1A

=c2

Part 2 =c1 163-278.38Z =c2 163A-1475
=c1 163-278.39 =c2 163A-1476 =c1 163-278.39A
previously repealed
=c1 163-278.39B previously recodified
=c1 163-278.39C =c2 163A-1477
=c1
Part 2

=c2

Part 3
=c1 163-278.40 =c2 163A-1495
=c1 163-278.40A =c2 163A-1496
=c1 163-278.40B =c2 163A-1497
=c1 163-278.40C =c2 163A-1498
=c1 163-278.40D =c2 163A-1499
=c1 163-278.40E =c2 163A-1500
=c1 163-278.40F =c2 163A-1501
=c1 163-278.40G =c2 163A-1502
=c1 163-278.40H =c2 163A-1503
=c1 163-278.40I =c2 163A-1504
=c1 163-278.40J =c2 163A-1505
=c1
Articles 22B, 22C
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22D

=c2

Article 24
=c1 163-278.69 =c2 163A-1520
=c1
Articles 22E, 22F
previously repealed
=c1
Article 22J

=c2

Article 25
=c1 163-278.99E =c2 163A-1535
=c1
Articles 22G, 22H
previously repealed
=c1
Articles 22I, K, L reserved
=c1
Article 22M

=c2

Article 26
=c1 163-278.300 =c2 163A-1550
=c1 163-278.301 =c2 163A-1551 =c1 163-278.302 thru
=c2 163A-1552
thru =c1 163-278.305 reserved =c2 163A-1555 reserved
=c1 163-278.306 =c2 163A-1556
=c1 163-278.307 =c2 163A-1557
=c1 163-278.308 =c2 163A-1558 =c1 163-278.309 =c2 163A-1559
=c1 163-278.310 =c2 163A-1560 =c1 163-278.311 thru
=c2 163A-1561 thru =c1 163-278.315 reserved =c2 163A-1565 reserved
=c1 163-278.316 =c2 163A-1566
=c1 163-278.317 thru
=c2 163A-1567 thru =c1 163-278.319 reserved =c2 163A-1569
reserved
=c1 163-278.320 =c2 163A-1570
=c1
Subchapter IX

=c2

Article 27
=c1
Article 23

=c2

Part 1
=c1 163-279 =c2 163A-1585 =c1 163-280 thru
163-281 previously repealed
=c1 163-282 =c2 163A-1586
=c1 163-283 =c2 163A-1587
=c1 163-283.1 =c2 163A-1588
=c1 163-284 =c2 163A-1589
=c1 163-284.1 =c2 163A-1590
=c1 163-285 previously repealed
=c1 163-286 =c2 163A-1591
=c1 163-287 =c2 163A-1592
=c1 163-288 =c2 163A-1593
=c1 163-288.1 =c2 163A-1594
=c1 163-288.1A =c2 163A-1595
=c1 163-288.2 =c2 163A-1596
=c1 163-288.3 =c2 163A-1597
=c1 163-289 =c2 163A-1598
=c1 163-290 =c2 163A-1599
=c1
Article 24

=c2

Part 2
=c1

163-291 =c2 163A-1615
=c1 163-292 =c2 163A-1616
=c1 163-293 =c2 163A-1617
=c1 163-294 =c2 163A-1618
=c1 163-294.1 =c2 163A-1619
=c1 163-294.2 =c2 163A-1620
=c1 163-294.3 =c2 163A-1621
=c1 163-294.4 =c2 163A-1622
=c1 163-295 =c2 163A-1623
=c1 163-296 =c2 163A-1624
=c1 163-297 =c2 163A-1625
=c1 163-298 =c2 163A-1626
=c1 163-299 =c2 163A-1627
=c1 163-300 =c2 163A-1628
=c1 163-301 =c2 163A-1629
=c1 163-302 =c2 163A-1630
=c1 163-303
previously repealed
=c1 163-304 =c2 163A-1631
=c1 163-305 =c2 163A-1632
=c1 163-306 =c2 163A-1633
=c1

Subchapter X repealed =c1
Article 25 repealed =te

Please note that Chapter 163A sections that were re-recodified into Chapter 163 have their former G.S. number except where the section was broken up into multiple sections in 2017 pursuant to 2017-6; these have been renumbered in Chapter 163. The renumbering and relettering of subsections and subdivisions, etc., within each section done in 2017 has been retained except in a few cases in which the original Chapter 163 section had no compound subsection or subdivision numbers (i.e., (a1), (1a), etc.) but retaining the 2017 renumbering and relettering would result in such a number because of subsections or subdivisions being un-repealed. These changes are not shown on this chart.